Utah statutes.
78B-3-408.   Writing required as basis for liability for breach of guarantee, warranty, contract, or assurance of result.

Liability may not be imposed upon any health care provider on the basis of an alleged breach of guarantee, warranty, contract, or assurance of result to be obtained from any health care rendered unless the guarantee, warranty, contract, or assurance is set forth in writing and signed by the health care provider or an authorized agent of the provider.

